Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 148.4 Emeritus license. 1. The board shall grant an emeritus license to a physician and surgeon or osteopathic physician and surgeon who is at least sixty years of age, who is or will be primarily engaged in the practice of supervising and training resident physicians, and who submits an application on a form prescribed by the board. 2. An emeritus license issued pursuant to this section shall entitle the licensee to maintain the same scope of practice as the licensee had as a physician and surgeon or osteopathic physician and surgeon. 3. An emeritus license issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for three years from the date of issue and may be renewed once. 4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a licensee licensed pursuant to this section is not required to complete continuing education credits to maintain or renew an emeritus license. 5. The application and renewal fee for an emeritus license shall be one half of the application and renewal fees for a license to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. Senate File 469, p. 2 6. The board shall adopt rules for the implementation of this section, including a rule that defines âprimarily engaged in the practice of supervising and training resident physiciansâ. 7. The board shall not issue a license pursuant to this section prior to January 1, 2026. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 469, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor